Utah statutes.
67-5a-4.   Holding public employment.

A member of the council may not be disqualified as a member by holding any public office or employment, and he does not forfeit any office or employment due to his membership on the council.  This section takes precedence over any conflicting state law, local ordinance, or city charter.

